Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-722
Central registry; subject of report; access to information.

Upon request, a subject of the report of child abuse or neglect
or, if such subject is a minor or otherwise legally incompetent, the guardian
or guardian ad litem of the subject, shall be entitled to receive a copy of
all information contained in the central registry of child protection
cases maintained pursuant to section 28-718 pertaining to his or her case.
The department shall not release data that would be harmful or detrimental
or that would identify or locate a person who, in good faith, made a report
of child abuse or neglect or cooperated in a subsequent investigation unless
ordered to do so by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1979, LB 505, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 14;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 12.